Utah statutes.
17-16-20.   Salaries in case of combined offices.

Whenever the county legislative body shall combine the duties of any county officers the salary of the person discharging the duties of such offices shall be fixed at a sum not exceeding the highest salary paid to either of the officers whose offices are so combined, in addition to an amount not exceeding one-half of the salary fixed for the other officer, when only two offices are combined, or when more than two offices are combined, in addition to such highest salary, one-third of the combined salaries of such other officers.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

